src/fst/morphology/stems/stems-verbs-moh.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in Mohawk language are actions.

!! Red verbs are essentially non-transitive verbs used in Active Voice
!! Blue verbs are essentially non-transitive verbs used in Passive Voice
!! Purple verbs are transitive verbs

!! -----------------------VERBS ---------------------------------------

LEXICON VerbStem


<0:rootStart>   VerbRoots   ;


LEXICON VerbRoots

!! --------------some example c-stem verbs (verb stems starting with a constant)
nòn%:we's   RedVerbs; !! to like
norónhkwa  RedVerbs; !! to love
nòn%:we's   BlueVerbs; !! to like
norónhkwa  BlueVerbs; !! to love

!! -------------verb stems starting with an "A"
atonhkárya’ks  RedVerbs; !! to be hungry (page 131)
atera'swí%:yo    BlueVerbs; !! to be lucky (page 131)
atketsko    RedVerbs; !!to get up, brian's list, page 2


!! -------------verb stems starting with an "I"
í%:tenht   BlueVerbs; !! to be  poor (page 132)
í%:tahs BlueVerbs; !! to be sleeping
!! -------------verb stems starting with an "E" or "EN"
é%:kahs BlueVerbs; !! to like the taste of something (page 131)
entórha RedVerbs; !! lazy (page 131)
!! --------------verb stems starting with an "O" or "ON"
onni RedVerbs; !! to make smth, Brian's list
on'wehskwen BlueVerbs ; !! to enjoy doing smth Brian's page 14


LEXICON RedVerbs
@U.VerbType.Red@    #;

LEXICON BlueVerbs
@U.VerbType.Blue@    #;

LEXICON PurpleVerbs
@U.VerbType.Blue@    #;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
